Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-27,157
Board; membership; terms; officers; quorum; expenses.

The Nebraska Economic Forecasting Advisory Board shall consist of nine members, five of whom shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council and four of whom shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The original gubernatorial appointees shall serve for two-year terms. Successive gubernatorial appointees and all legislative appointees shall serve for four-year terms. After appointments are made, the board shall select a chairperson and a vice-chairperson from its membership. The chairperson and vice-chairperson shall serve for two-year terms. The chairperson of the board on September 6, 1985, shall serve until his or her successor is selected. Each member of the board shall have demonstrated expertise in the field of tax policy, economics, or economic forecasting. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting business and every act of a majority of the members shall be deemed an act of the board. Board members shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. Board members appointed by the Legislative Council shall receive such reimbursement out of the appropriation made to the Legislature's Fiscal and Program Analysis Program. Board members appointed by the Governor shall receive such reimbursement out of the appropriation made to the Department of Revenue for administration.

Laws 1984, LB 892, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 283, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 84.